HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.aff
FLAG num
SFX 5994 0 ýändikleri .
SFX 5994 0 ýändikleriniň .
SFX 5994 0 ýändiklerine .
SFX 5994 0 ýändiklerini .
SFX 5994 0 ýändiklerinde .
SFX 5994 0 ýändiklerinden .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigim .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigimiň .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigime .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigimi .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigimde .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigimden .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigiň .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigiňiň .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigiňe .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigiňi .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigiňde .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigiňden .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigi .
SFX 5994 0 meýändiginiň .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigine .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigini .
SFX 5994 0 meýändiginde .
SFX 5994 0 meýändiginden .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigimiz .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigimiziň .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigimize .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigimizi .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigimizde .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigimizden .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigiňiz .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigiňiziň .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigiňize .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigiňizi .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigiňizde .
SFX 5994 0 meýändigiňizden .
SFX 5994 0 meýändikleri .
SFX 5994 0 meýändikleriniň .
SFX 5994 0 meýändiklerine .
SFX 5994 0 meýändiklerini .
SFX 5994 0 meýändiklerinde .
SFX 5994 0 meýändiklerinden .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigim .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigimiň .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigime .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigimi .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigimde .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigimden .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigiň .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigiňiň .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigiňe .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigiňi .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigiňde .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigiňden .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigi .
SFX 5994 0 jekdiginiň .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigine .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigini .
SFX 5994 0 jekdiginde .
SFX 5994 0 jekdiginden .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigimiz .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigimiziň .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigimize .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigimizi .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigimizde .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigimizden .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigiňiz .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigiňiziň .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigiňize .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigiňizi .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigiňizde .
SFX 5994 0 jekdigiňizden .
SFX 5994 0 jekdikleri .
SFX 5994 0 jekdikleriniň .
SFX 5994 0 jekdiklerine .
SFX 5994 0 jekdiklerini .
SFX 5994 0 jekdiklerinde .
SFX 5994 0 jekdiklerinden .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigim .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigimiň .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigime .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigimi .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigimde .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigimden .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigiň .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigiňiň .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigiňe .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigiňi .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigiňde .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigiňden .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigi .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdiginiň .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigine .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigini .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdiginde .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdiginden .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigimiz .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigimiziň .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigimize .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigimizi .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigimizde .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigimizden .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigiňiz .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigiňiziň .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigiňize .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigiňizi .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigiňizde .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdigiňizden .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdikleri .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdikleriniň .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdiklerine .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdiklerini .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdiklerinde .
SFX 5994 0 mejekdiklerinden .
SFX 5994 üz zenler .
SFX 5994 ül lenler .
SFX 5994 ün nenler .
SFX 5994 ür renler .
SFX 5994 üs senler .
SFX 5994 üş şenler .
SFX 5994 üz zenleriň .
SFX 5994 ül lenleriň .
SFX 5994 ün nenleriň .
SFX 5994 ür renleriň .
SFX 5994 üs senleriň .
SFX 5994 üş şenleriň .
SFX 5994 üz zenlere .
SFX 5994 ül lenlere .
SFX 5994 ün nenlere .
SFX 5994 ür renlere .
SFX 5994 üs senlere .
SFX 5994 üş şenlere .
SFX 5994 üz zenleri .
SFX 5994 ül lenleri .
SFX 5994 ün nenleri .
SFX 5994 ür renleri .
SFX 5994 üs senleri .
SFX 5994 üş şenleri .
SFX 5994 üz zenlerde .
SFX 5994 ül lenlerde .
SFX 5994 ün nenlerde .
SFX 5994 ür renlerde .
SFX 5994 üs senlerde .
SFX 5994 üş şenlerde .
SFX 5994 üz zenlerden .
SFX 5994 ül lenlerden .
SFX 5994 ün nenlerden .
SFX 5994 ür renlerden .
SFX 5994 üs senlerden .
SFX 5994 üş şenlerden .
SFX 5994 0 medikler .
SFX 5994 0 medikleriň .
SFX 5994 0 mediklere .
SFX 5994 0 medikleri .
SFX 5994 0 mediklerde .
SFX 5994 0 mediklerden .
SFX 5994 0 ýänler .
SFX 5994 0 ýänleriň .
SFX 5994 0 ýänlere .
SFX 5994 0 ýänleri .
SFX 5994 0 ýänlerde .
SFX 5994 0 ýänlerden .
SFX 5994 0 meýänler .
SFX 5994 0 meýänleriň .
SFX 5994 0 meýänlere .
SFX 5994 0 meýänleri .
SFX 5994 0 meýänlerde .
SFX 5994 0 meýänlerden .
SFX 5994 0 jekler .
SFX 5994 0 jekleriň .
SFX 5994 0 jeklere .
SFX 5994 0 jekleri .
SFX 5994 0 jeklerde .
SFX 5994 0 jeklerden .
SFX 5994 0 mejekler .
SFX 5994 0 mejekleriň .
SFX 5994 0 mejeklere .
SFX 5994 0 mejekleri .
SFX 5994 0 mejeklerde .
SFX 5994 0 mejeklerden .
SFX 5994 üz züpdim .
SFX 5994 ül lüpdim .
SFX 5994 ün nüpdim .
SFX 5994 ür rüpdim .
SFX 5994 üs süpdim .
SFX 5994 üş şüpdim .
SFX 5994 0 mändim .
SFX 5994 üz züpdiň .
SFX 5994 ül lüpdiň .
SFX 5994 ün nüpdiň .
SFX 5994 ür rüpdiň .
SFX 5994 üs süpdiň .
SFX 5994 üş şüpdiň .
SFX 5994 0 mändiň .
SFX 5994 üz züpdi .
SFX 5994 ül lüpdi .
SFX 5994 ün nüpdi .
SFX 5994 ür rüpdi .
SFX 5994 üs süpdi .
SFX 5994 üş şüpdi .
SFX 5994 0 mändi .
SFX 5994 üz züpdik .
SFX 5994 ül lüpdik .
SFX 5994 ün nüpdik .
SFX 5994 ür rüpdik .
SFX 5994 üs süpdik .
SFX 5994 üş şüpdik .
SFX 5994 0 mändik .
SFX 5994 üz züpdiňiz .
SFX 5994 ül lüpdiňiz .
SFX 5994 ün nüpdiňiz .
SFX 5994 ür rüpdiňiz .
SFX 5994 üs süpdiňiz .
SFX 5994 üş şüpdiňiz .
SFX 5994 0 mändiňiz .
SFX 5994 üz züpdiler .
SFX 5994 ül lüpdiler .
SFX 5994 ün nüpdiler .
SFX 5994 ür rüpdiler .
SFX 5994 üs süpdiler .
SFX 5994 üş şüpdiler .
SFX 5994 0 mändiler .
SFX 5994 0 ýärdim .
SFX 5994 0 meýärdim .
SFX 5994 0 ýärdiň .
SFX 5994 0 meýärdiň .
SFX 5994 0 ýärdi .
SFX 5994 0 meýärdi .
SFX 5994 0 ýärdik .
SFX 5994 0 meýärdik .
SFX 5994 0 ýärdiňiz .
SFX 5994 0 meýärdiňiz .
SFX 5994 0 ýärdiler .
SFX 5994 0 meýärdiler .
SFX 5994 0 jekdim .
SFX 5994 0 jekdiň .
SFX 5994 0 jekdi .
SFX 5994 0 jekdik .
SFX 5994 0 jekdiňiz .
SFX 5994 0 jekdiler .
SFX 5994 üz zen .
SFX 5994 ül len .
SFX 5994 ün nen .
SFX 5994 ür ren .
SFX 5994 üs sen .
SFX 5994 üş şen .
SFX 5994 üz zeniň .
SFX 5994 ül leniň .
SFX 5994 ün neniň .
SFX 5994 ür reniň .
SFX 5994 üs seniň .
SFX 5994 üş şeniň .
SFX 5994 üz zene .
SFX 5994 ül lene .
SFX 5994 ün nene .
SFX 5994 ür rene .
SFX 5994 üs sene .
SFX 5994 üş şene .
SFX 5994 üz zeni .
SFX 5994 ül leni .
SFX 5994 ün neni .
SFX 5994 ür reni .
SFX 5994 üs seni .
SFX 5994 üş şeni .
SFX 5994 üz zende .
SFX 5994 ül lende .
SFX 5994 ün nende .
SFX 5994 ür rende .
SFX 5994 üs sende .
SFX 5994 üş şende .
SFX 5994 üz zenden .
SFX 5994 ül lenden .
SFX 5994 ün nenden .
SFX 5994 ür renden .
SFX 5994 üs senden .
SFX 5994 üş şenden .
SFX 5994 üz zenleri .
SFX 5994 ül lenleri .
SFX 5994 ün nenleri .
SFX 5994 ür renleri .
SFX 5994 üs senleri .
SFX 5994 üş şenleri .
SFX 5994 üz zenleriniň .
SFX 5994 ül lenleriniň .
SFX 5994 ün nenleriniň .
SFX 5994 ür renleriniň .
SFX 5994 üs senleriniň .
SFX 5994 üş şenleriniň .
SFX 5994 üz zenlerine .
SFX 5994 ül lenlerine .
SFX 5994 ün nenlerine .
SFX 5994 ür renlerine .
SFX 5994 üs senlerine .
SFX 5994 üş şenlerine .
SFX 5994 üz zenlerini .
SFX 5994 ül lenlerini .
SFX 5994 ün nenlerini .
SFX 5994 ür renlerini .
SFX 5994 üs senlerini .
SFX 5994 üş şenlerini .
SFX 5994 üz zenlerinde .
SFX 5994 ül lenlerinde .
SFX 5994 ün nenlerinde .
SFX 5994 ür renlerinde .
SFX 5994 üs senlerinde .
SFX 5994 üş şenlerinde .
SFX 5994 üz zenlerinden .
SFX 5994 ül lenlerinden .
SFX 5994 ün nenlerinden .
SFX 5994 ür renlerinden .
SFX 5994 üs senlerinden .
SFX 5994 üş şenlerinden .
SFX 5994 0 iş .
SFX 5994 0 işiň .
SFX 5994 0 işe .
SFX 5994 0 işi .
SFX 5994 0 işde .
SFX 5994 0 işden .
SFX 5994 0 işim .
SFX 5994 0 işimiň .
SFX 5994 0 işime .
SFX 5994 0 işimi .
SFX 5994 0 işimde .
SFX 5994 0 işimden .
SFX 5994 0 işi .
SFX 5994 0 işiniň .
SFX 5994 0 işine .
SFX 5994 0 işini .
SFX 5994 0 işinde .
SFX 5994 0 işinden .
