HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.dic
böwüs/5994
bürül/5994
bürüş/5994
büzül/5994
çöşül/5994
çöwür/5994
çözül/5994
çümür/5994
çümüş/5994
çürüş/5994
döwül/5994
döwün/5994
döwüş/5994
düwül/5994
düwün/5994
düwüş/5994
düzül/5994
gömül/5994
gömüş/5994
görül/5994
görün/5994
görüş/5994
gülüş/5994
hüňül/5994
köwül/5994
köwün/5994
köwüş/5994
ölüş/5994
öwül/5994
öwün/5994
öwür/5994
öwüs/5994
öýül/5994
söýül/5994
söýün/5994
söýüş/5994
sümül/5994
sümür/5994
sürül/5994
sürün/5994
sürüş/5994
süýül/5994
süýüş/5994
süzül/5994
üzül/5994
ýügür/5994
ýüwür/5994
